Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-4,125
Disapproved plan; return to affected school districts.

If the state committee disapproves the plan pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, it shall be considered a disapproved plan and returned to the affected school districts as a disapproved plan.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 25.